Massachusetts, session 194th, H472.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Subsection (d) of section 4 of chapter 93B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after clause (4) the following:-
(5) to fail to clearly and conspicuously post at their place of business other dealership
locations within the commonwealth under the same ownership group, if any.
of 1